Utah statutes.
70D-2-201.   Notification of department -- Exemptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person may not engage in business as a lender, broker, or servicer in this state before the day on which the person:

(a)  files written notification with the commissioner in accordance with Section 70D-2-202; and

(b)  pays a fee required by Section 70D-2-203.

(2)  The following persons are exempt from this part, except for a reimbursement or fee described in Subsection 70D-2-203(2):

(a) a federally insured depository institution in this state;

(b) a wholly owned subsidiary of a depository institution described in Subsection (2)(a); and

(c)  a person who:

(i) is required to be licensed with the Division of Real Estate pursuant to Title 61, Chapter 2c, Utah Residential Mortgage Practices and Licensing Act; and

(ii)  is not a servicer.

